en: Mashed split peas
fr: Purées de pois cassés
hr: Pire od graška
nl: Gepureerde spliterwten

en: Frozen raw butter beans, Frozen raw yellow beans
fr: Haricots beurre surgelés crus

en: Frozen raw onions
fr: Oignons surgelés crus

en: Charlottes
fr: Charlottes
hr: Šarlote
nl: Charlotte

en: Chocolate Charlottes
fr: Charlottes au chocolat
hr: Čokoladne šarlote
nl: Chocola Charlottes

en: Fruit Charlottes
fr: Charlottes aux fruits
hr: Voćne šarlote
nl: Vruchtencharlotte

en: Crumbles
fr: Crumbles
hr: Mrvi se
it: Briciole
nl: Kruimelschotels, Kruimelschotel

en: Apple crumbles
fr: Crumbles aux pommes
hr: Mrvice od jabuka
it: Briciole di mela
nl: Appelkruimeltaart, Appelkruimeltaarten

en: stuffing
de: Füllung
fr: farces
hr: Punjenje
it: Stuffing
zh: 馅料

en: Frozen stuffing
fr: farces surgelées

en: Dried deffated black soldier fly protein
fr: Insecte (Mouche Soldat Noir)
hr: Sušeni deffated protein crne vojničke muhe
la: Hermetia illucens
nl: Zwarte soldatenvlieg

en: Fruit juice mixed - apple base standard
fr: Jus multifruit - base pomme standard
hr: Voćni sok miješani - baza jabuka standard
nl: Multivruchtensappen op basis van appelsap

en: Citrus juices
fr: Jus d'agrumes

en: Frozen citrus juices
fr: Jus d'agrumes surgelés

en: Cheese from goat's milk from raw milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre lactique affiné au lait cru (type Crottin de Chavignol Picodon Rocamadour Sainte-Maure de Touraine)
hr: Sir od kozjeg mlijeka od sirovog mlijeka
nl: Geitenkazen op basis van rauwe melk

en: Chevrot cheese from goat's milk
fr: Chevrot (fromage de chèvre)
hr: Chevrot sir od kozjeg mlijeka
nl: Chevrot geitenkazen

en: Strawberry in-season raw
fr: Fraise de saison crue
hr: Jagoda u sezoni sirova
nl: Aardbeien (van het land)

en: Strawberry off-season raw
fr: Fraise hors saison crue
hr: Jagoda izvan sezone sirova
nl: Aardbeien (uit de kas)

en: Tomato in season raw
fr: Tomate de saison crue
hr: Rajčica u sezoni sirova
nl: Tomaten (van het land)

en: Tomato off season raw
fr: Tomate hors saison crue
hr: Rajčica izvan sezone sirova
nl: Tomaten (uit de kas)